test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuldnw8_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - `kuldnõ: # Noun (8) `kuldnõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Nom: kuldnõ
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Gen: alodsõ
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Par: kuldsõt
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Ill: [kuldsõhe, kuldsõdõ]
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Ine: [kuldsõn, kuldsõh, kuldsõhn]
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Ade: kuldsõl
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Abl: kuldsõlt
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Tra: kuldsõs
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Ter: kuldsõniq
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Abe: kuldsõldaq
     kuldnõ+N+Sg+Com: kuldsõgaq
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Nom: kuldsõq
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuldsidõ, kuldsiidõ, kullastõ]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Par: [kuldsit, kuldsiid]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Ill: [kuldsihe, kuldsiihe, kuldsiidõ, kullastõhe, kullastõdõ]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Ine: [kuldsin, kuldsih, kuldsihn, kuldsiin, kuldsiih, kuldsiihn, kullastõn, kullastõh, kullastõhn]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Ela: [kuldsist, kuldsiist, kullastõst]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+All: [kuldsilõ, kuldsiilõ, kullastõlõ]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Ade: [kuldsil, kuldsiil, kullastõl]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Abl: [kuldsilt, kuldsiilt, kullastõlt]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Tra: [kuldsis, kuldsiis, kullastõs]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Ter: [kuldsiniq, kuldsiiniq, kullastõniq]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Abe: [kuldsildaq, kuldsiildaq, kullastõldaq]
     kuldnõ+N+Pl+Com: [kuldsidõgaq, kuldsiidõgaq, kullastõgaq]
